Tennessee, session 114, HB2553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 1, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
49-1-303. Presidential fitness test.
By December 31, 2027, the department of education shall review and propose
revisions to physical education standards to incorporate guidance published by the
President's Council on Sports, Fitness, and Nutrition to reestablish the Presidential
Fitness Test pursuant to Executive Order No. 14327 of the president of the United
States on July 31, 2025. The proposed standards must be posted for public review on
the state board of education's website prior to final adoption by the state board pursuant
to § 49-1-309.
SECTION 2. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2553
011249
- 1 -